Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska71-5803.12
Person, defined.

Person means an individual, a trust or estate, a partnership, a limited liability company, a corporation, including associations, joint-stock companies, and insurance companies, a state, a political subdivision or instrumentality, including a municipal corporation, of a state, or any legal entity recognized by the state.

Laws 1979, LB 172, § 22;

Laws 1982, LB 378, § 13;

Laws 1993, LB 121, § 445;

R.S.1943, (1996), § 71-5822;

Laws 1997, LB 798, § 16.